th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เตียงและอุปกรณ์: อุปกรณ์เตียงและฐานเตียง; ที่นอนและกรอบเตียง; ที่วางเท้า; หัวเตียง; ฐานฟูกที่นอน; ฟูกที่นอน
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Camas e acessórios: Acessórios para camas e estruturas de cama; Camas e estruturas de camas; Pés; Cabeceiras; Bases de colchão; Colchões
zh-TW: 家具 > 床和配件: 床/床架配件; 床和床架; 腳踏板; 床頭板; 床墊下墊; 床墊
de: Möbel > Betten & Zubehör: Bett- & Bettrahmenzubehör; Betten & Bettgestelle; Fußteile; Kopfteile; Matratzen-Untergestelle; Matratzen
en: Furniture > Beds & Accessories: Bed & Bed Frame Accessories; Beds & Bed Frames; Footboards; Headboards; Mattress Foundations; Mattresses
cs: Nábytek > Postele a doplňky: Doplňky k postelím; Postele a postelové rámy; Nožní části postelí; Čela postelí; Postelové rošty; Matrace
ro-RO: Mobilier > Paturi și accesorii: Accesorii pat și cadru de pat; Paturi și cadre de pat; Tăblii de pat pentru picioare; Tăblii de pat pentru cap; Somiere pentru saltele; Saltele
sv: Möbler > Sängar och tillbehör: Sängtillbehör; Sängar och sängramar; Fotgavlar; Sänggavlar; Resårbottnar; Madrasser
hr-HR: Namještaj > Kreveti i dodaci: Dodaci za krevet i okvir kreveta; Kreveti i okviri kreveta; Podnožja; Uzglavlja; Osnove za madrac; Madraci
lt-LT: Baldai > Lovos ir priedai: Lovų ir lovų rėmų priedai; Lovos ir lovų rėmai; Kojūgaliai; Galvūgaliai; Čiužinių pagrindai; Čiužiniai
sk-SK: Nábytok > Príslušenstvo k posteliam: Príslušenstvo k posteliam a posteľným rámom; Postele a posteľné rámy; Nožné panely postele; Čelá postele; Základne matracov; Matrace
nl: Meubelen > Bedden en accessoires: Accessoires voor bedden; Bedden en ledikanten; Voetenborden; Hoofdborden; Matrasbodems; Matrassen
ja: 家具 > ベッド・ベッド用品: ベッド用品; ベッド・ベッドフレーム; フットボード; ヘッドボード; マットレスベース; マットレス
el: Έπιπλα > Κρεβάτια & αξεσουάρ: Αξεσουάρ κρεβατιών & πλαισίων κρεβατιών; Κρεβάτια & πλαίσια κρεβατιών; Στηρίγματα ποδιών; Κεφαλάρια; Βάσεις στρωμάτων; Στρώματα
pl: Meble > Łóżka i akcesoria: Akcesoria do łóżek; Łóżka i ramy łóżek; Oparcia dla nóg; Zagłówki; Podstawy pod materace; Materace
hu: Bútor > Ágyak és kiegészítők: Ágy- és ágykeret-kiegészítők; Ágyak és ágykeretek; Lábdeszkák; Fejtámlák; Matracalapok; Matracok
fr: Meubles > Lits et accessoires: Accessoires pour lits et cadres de lit; Lits et cadres de lit; Pieds de lit; Têtes de lit; Sommiers; Matelas
fi: Huonekalut > Sängyt ja tarvikkeet: Sänkyjen ja sänkykehikoiden lisätarvikkeet; Sängyt ja sänkykehikot; Jalkalevyt; Päätylevyt; Sälepohjat; Patjat
da: Møbler > Senge og tilbehør: Sengetilbehør; Senge og sengerammer; Fodgavle; Hovedgavle; Undersenge; Madrasser
vi: Đồ gỗ > Phòng ngủ và phụ kiện phòng ngủ: Phụ kiện giường và khung giường; Giường và khung giường; Ván để chân; Đầu đầu giường; Đế để nệm; Đệm giường
tr: Mobilyalar > Yataklar ve Aksesuarlar: Yatak ve Yatak Çerçevesi Aksesuarları; Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri; Ayak Ucu; Yatak Başlıkları; Yatak Altlıkları; Döşekler
zh-CN: 家具 > 床具与配件: 床配件; 床和床架; 脚踏板; 床头板; 床垫架/排骨架; 床垫
it: Arredamento > Letti e accessori: Accessori per letti e telai per letto; Letti e telai per letti; Pedane; Poggiatesta; Basi per materassi; Materassi
nb: Møbler > Senger og tilbehør: Tilbehør til senger og sengerammer; Senger og sengerammer; Fotbrett; Sengegavler; Madrassunderlag; Madrasser
bg-BG: Мебели > Легла и аксесоари: Аксесоари за легло и рамка за легло; Легла и рамки за легла; Табли за долната част на леглото; Табли за горната част на леглото; Основи за матрак; Матраци
ru: Мебель > Кровати и аксессуары для них: Аксессуары для кроватей; Кровати; Изножья кроватей; Изголовья кроватей; Основания для матрасов; Матрасы
pt-BR: Móveis > Camas e acessórios: Acessórios para cama; Camas e estruturas de camas; Suporte para pés; Cabeceira; Estrados; Colchões
ko: 가구 > 침구/부대용품: 침대/침대 프레임 부대용품; 침대/침대 프레임; 풋보드; 헤드보드; 매트리스 받침대; 매트리스
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Postelje in dodatki: Dodatki za postelje in posteljne okvirje; Postelje in posteljni okvirji; Podnožja; Vzglavja; Posteljna podnožja; Vzmetnice
es: Mobiliario > Camas y accesorios: Accesorios para camas y somieres; Camas y somieres; Estribos; Cabeceros; Somieres; Colchones